New York, session 2025-2026, A11580.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 66 of the public service law, as 2 amended by chapter 784 of the laws of 1923, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. Require every person and corporation under its supervision and it 5 shall be the duty of every such person and corporation to file with the 6 commission an annual report, verified by the oath of the president, 7 vice-president, treasurer, secretary, general manager, or receiver, if 8 any, thereof, or by the person required to file the same. The verifica- 9 tion shall be made by said official holding office at the time of the 10 filing of said report, and if not made upon the knowledge of the person 11 verifying the same shall set forth the sources of [his] such person's 12 information and the grounds of [his] the person's belief as to any 13 matters not stated to be verified upon [his] the person's knowledge. The 14 report shall show in detail (a) the amount of its authorized capital 15 stock and the amount thereof issued and outstanding; (b) the amount of 16 its authorized bonded indebtedness and the amount of its bonds and other 17 forms of evidence of indebtedness issued and outstanding; (c) its 18 receipts and expenditures during the preceding year; (d) the amount paid 19 as dividends upon its stock and as interest upon its bonds; (e) the 20 names of its officers and the aggregate amount paid as salaries to them 21 and the amount paid as wages to its employees; (f) the location of its 22 plant or plants and system, with a full description of its property and 23 franchises, stating in detail how each franchise stated to be owned was 24 acquired; and (g) such other facts pertaining to the operation and main- 25 tenance of the plant and system, and the affairs of such person or 26 corporation as may be required by the commission. Such reports shall be 27 in the form, cover the period and be filed at the time prescribed by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01798-01-5 A. 11580 2 1 commission. The commission may, from time to time, make changes and 2 additions in such forms. When any such report is defective or believed 3 to be erroneous, the commission shall notify the person, corporation or 4 municipality making such report to amend the same within a time 5 prescribed by the commission. Any such person or corporation or munici- 6 pality which shall neglect to make any such report or which shall fail 7 to correct any such report within the time prescribed by the commission 8 shall be liable to a penalty of not more than one-tenth of one percent 9 of the annual net revenues of such person, corporation or municipality 10 for the past year, but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars nor 11 less than one hundred dollars and an additional penalty of [one hundred 12 dollars] not more than the same amount for each day after the prescribed 13 time for which it shall neglect to file or correct the same, to be sued 14 for in the name of the people of the state of New York. The amount 15 recovered in any such action shall be paid into the state treasury and 16 be credited to the general fund. The commission may extend the time 17 prescribed for cause shown. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 19 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the public service 20 commission is authorized to take any and all actions, including but not 21 limited to the promulgation of any necessary rules, necessary to fully 22 implement the provisions of this act on its effective date.